Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1718
Bonds; legal investment; considered securities.

Bonds issued by the authority under the Parking Authority Law are hereby made securities in which the state and all political subdivisions of the state, their officers, boards, commissions, departments, or other agencies, all banks, bankers, savings banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, investment companies, insurance associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business, and all administrators, executors, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries, and all other persons who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state, may properly and legally invest any funds, including capital belonging to them or within their control. Such bonds or other securities or obligations are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officers or agency of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the state is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

Laws 1955, c. 22, § 18, p. 111;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 302.